Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
D. Definitions

§ 17-19-140.
General definitions.

As used in this act:

“Approved by (or approval by) the members” means approved or ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes represented and voting at a duly held meeting at which a quorum is present (which affirmative votes also constitute a majority of the required quorum) or by a written ballot or written consent in conformity with this act or by the affirmative vote, written ballot or written consent of such greater proportion, including the votes of all the members of any class, unit or grouping as may be provided in the articles, bylaws or this act for any specified member action;

“Articles of incorporation” or “articles” include amended and restated articles of incorporation and articles of merger;

“Board” or “board of directors” means the board of directors except that no person or group of persons are the board of directors because of powers delegated to that person or group pursuant to W.S.

17-19-801

, and includes any person or group under whose authority corporate powers are exercised and under whose direction the affairs of the corporation are managed, regardless of the name of the person or group whether it be trustees, regents, overseers or some other name;

“Bylaws” means the code or codes of rules (other than the articles) adopted pursuant to this act for the regulation or management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name or names by which such rules are designated;

“Certificate of existence” means a certificate issued pursuant to W.S.

17-19-128

;

“Class” refers to a group of memberships which have the same rights with respect to voting, dissolution, redemption and transfer. For the purpose of this section, rights shall be considered the same if they are determined by a formula applied uniformly;

“Corporation” means public benefit, mutual benefit and religious corporation;

“Delegates” means those persons elected or appointed to vote in a representative assembly for the election of a director or directors or on other matters;

“Deliver” includes mail;

“Directors” means individuals, designated in the articles or bylaws or elected by the incorporators, and their successors and individuals elected or appointed by any other name or title to act as members of the board;

“Distribution” means the payment of a dividend or any part of the income or profit of a corporation to its members, directors or officers;

“Domestic corporation” means a corporation;

“Effective date of notice” is defined in W.S.

17-19-141

;

“Employee” does not include an officer or director who is not otherwise employed by the corporation;

“Entity” includes corporation and foreign corporation, business corporation and foreign business corporation, profit and nonprofit unincorporated association, corporation sole, business trust, estate, partnership, trust, and two (2) or more persons having a joint or common economic interest, and state, United States and foreign government;

“File,” “filed,” or “filing” means filed in the office of the secretary of state;

“Foreign corporation” means the corporation organized under a law other than the law of this state which would be a nonprofit corporation if formed under the laws of this state;

“Governmental subdivision” includes authority, county, district, municipality and any other political subdivision;

“Includes” denotes a partial definition;

“Individual” includes the estate of an incompetent individual;

“Means” denotes a complete definition;

“Member” means (without regard to what a person is called in the articles or bylaws) any person or persons who on more than one (1) occasion, pursuant to a provision of a corporation’s articles or bylaws, have the right to vote for the election of a director or directors, subject to the following:

A person is not a member by virtue of any of the following:

Any rights the person has as a delegate;

Any rights the person has to designate a director or directors; or

Any rights the person has as a director.

All members or all members of a class of members shall have the same number of votes unless the articles of incorporation specify otherwise.

“Membership” refers to the rights and obligations a member or members have pursuant to a corporation’s articles, bylaws and this act;

“Mutual benefit corporation” means a domestic corporation which is formed as a mutual benefit corporation pursuant to article 2 of this act or is required to be a mutual benefit corporation pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1804

;

“Notice” is defined in W.S.

17-19-141

;

“Person” includes any individual or entity;

“Principal office” means the office (within or outside this state) so designated in the annual report;

“Proceeding” includes civil suit and criminal, administrative, and investigatory action;

“Public benefit corporation” means a domestic corporation which is formed as a public benefit corporation pursuant to article 2 of this act or is required to be a public benefit corporation pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1804

;

“Record date” means the date established under article 6 or 7 of this act on which a corporation determines the identity of its members for the purposes of this act;

“Religious corporation” means a domestic corporation which is formed as a religious corporation pursuant to article 2 of this act or is required to be a religious corporation pursuant to W.S. 17-19-1804;

“Secretary” means the corporate officer to whom the board of directors has delegated responsibility under W.S. 17-19-840(b) for custody of the minutes of the directors’ and members’ meetings and for authenticating the records of the corporation;

“State,” when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state and commonwealth (and their agencies and governmental subdivisions) and a territory, and insular possession (and their agencies and governmental subdivisions) of the United States;

“United States” includes district, authority, bureau, commission, department and any other agency of the United States;

“Vote” includes authorization by written ballot and written consent;

“Voting power” means the total number of votes entitled to be cast for the election of directors at the time the determination of voting power is made, excluding a vote which is contingent upon the happening of a condition or event that has not occurred at the time. Where a class is entitled to vote as a class for directors, the determination of voting power of the class shall be based on the percentage of the number of directors the class is entitled to elect out of the total number of authorized directors;

“Registered agent” means as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

;

“This act” means W.S.

17-19-101

through

17-19-1807

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by inserting (a)(xxxvii) and redesignating the following paragraph as (a)(xxxviii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-141.
Notice.

Notice under this act shall be in writing unless oral notice is reasonable under the circumstances.

Notice may be communicated in person; by telephone, telegraph, teletype or other form of wire or wireless communication; or by mail or private carrier. If these forms of personal notice are impracticable, notice may be communicated by a newspaper of general circulation in the area where published; or by radio, television or other form of public broadcast communication.

Oral notice is effective when communicated if communicated in a comprehensible manner.

Written notice, if in a comprehensible form, is effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the postmark, if mailed correctly addressed and with first class postage affixed;

On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee;

Thirty (30) days after its deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the postmark, if mailed correctly addressed and with other than first class, registered or certified postage affixed.

Written notice is correctly addressed to a member of a domestic or foreign corporation if addressed to the member’s address shown in the corporation’s current list of members.

A written notice or report delivered as part of a newsletter, magazine or other publication regularly sent to members shall constitute a written notice or report if addressed or delivered to the member’s address shown in the corporation’s current list of members, or in the case of members who are residents of the same household and who have the same address in the corporation’s current list of members, if addressed or delivered to one (1) of such members, at the address appearing on the current list of members.

Written notice is correctly addressed to a domestic or foreign corporation (authorized to transact business in this state), other than in its capacity as a member, if addressed to its registered agent or to its secretary at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report or, in the case of a foreign corporation that has not yet delivered an annual report, in its application for a certificate of authority.

If W.S. 17-19-705(b) or any other provision of this act prescribes notice requirements for particular circumstances, those requirements govern. If articles or bylaws prescribe notice requirements, not inconsistent with this section or other provisions of this act, those requirements govern.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a) and twice in subsection (h), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).